Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-19,103
Unfair trade practices.

In addition to any other remedies available under the laws of this state, each violation of the Title Insurers Act and any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder shall be an unfair trade practice in the business of insurance subject to the Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 26.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.